Utah statutes.
31A-9-202.   Members and applicants in fraternals.
(1)  A fraternal may admit any natural person to membership under the
conditions and for the type of insurance and other benefits its laws
prescribe, subject to this chapter and other applicable laws.  A member
without insurance ceases to be a member for insurance purposes if the
fraternal is converted to a mutual.
(2)  Subject to Section 31A-21-104, fraternals may provide insurance for the
benefit of members, their dependents, and persons who are eligible for
membership except for age.
(3)  A fraternal may organize lodges for children who are not old enough for
membership, but who are to be covered by insurance.  Membership in local
lodges is not required for those children, and they have no voting rights.
(4)  A fraternal may extend temporary or conditional insurance coverage to a
nonmember who has applied for membership in the fraternal.
